src/Morphotactics/Morphotactics.lexc
Multichar_Symbols i̯ @P.ORIENT.ELAT@ @D.ORIENT.ELAT@ @P.ORIENT.OTHER@ @D.ORIENT@ @P.POS.N@ @D.POS.N@ @P.CAR.ON@ @R.CAR.ON@ +ZeroGrade +ClosedForm +Iotation +Class7

LEXICON Root
Prefix;

LEXICON Prefix
<"@P.ORIENT.OTHER@"@txt"../Morphotactics/Prefixes.txt"%.>	Prefix;
@P.POS.N@па.  Radical;
@P.POS.N@пра.  Radical;
@P.ORIENT.ELAT@от.  Prefix;
@P.CAR.ON@без.  Radical;
съ. Prefix;
у.  Prefix;
об. Prefix;
Radical;

LEXICON r
#;
!R;
!NU;
!AU;
!VU;
!PU;

LEXICON R
! Группа 2
.в		2/f;
! Группа 3
!.г		4c;
!.иг	2/f;
! Группа 4
.д		uk;
! Группа 6
.оj		2/p;
.еj		2/p;
.ьj		2/f;
.ьj		2/f+;
.ѣj		2/f;
! Группа 7
.к		2/f;
.к		2/m;
.ик		2/a;
.ък		2/f;
! Группа 8
.ел		2/a;
.ъл		2/m;
.ьл		2/m;
.ыл		2/f;
! Группа 9
.м		%0/n;
.ьм		2/m;
! Группа 10
.н		2/f;
.н		2/n;
.ен		1/a;
.ен		1/m;
.ун		2/m;
.ън		2/n;
.ьн		2/n;
.ѣн		2/n;
! Группа 11
!.р		2/a;
!.р		2/m;
.ер		2/m;
.ыр		2/f;
! Группа 14
.от		2/m;
.ет		2/m;
.ът		2/m;
.ьт		2/m;
.ѧт		%0/m;
.ѧт		2/a;
! Группа 15
.ъх		2/a;
.ух		2/m;

LEXICON RU
! Группа
.ив		2/a;
! Группа
.г		2/a;
! Группа
.ьj		2/a++;	! Компаратив
.ьj		2/m;
.ьj		2/n; ! Собирательные или локативные
! Группа
.ик		2/a;
.иц		2/f;
.ьц		2/m;
.ьц		2/n;
! Группа
.ѣл		1/f;
! Группа
.ен		2/a;
.н		2/a;
.н		2/f;
.ьн		2/a;
.ьн		2/m;
! Группа
.ът		1/m;

LEXICON N
! Группа 1
.ьб		2/f;
! Группа 2
.ив		2/a;
.ав		2/a;
! Группа 4
.ьд		2/f;
! Группа 5
.изн	2/f;
! Группа 6
.ьj		2/f;
.ьj		2/n;
.ьj		2/a; ! Притяжательные прилагательные
.ѣj		2/a++; ! Компаратив
! Группа 7
.ик		2/f;
.иц		2/f;
.ък		2/a;
! Группа 8
.ьл		2/a;
.ьл		2/m;
! Группа 10
!.н		2/a;
.ин		2/a; ! Относительные прилагательные
.ин		2/f; ! Сингулятивы
.ьн		2/a; ! Притяжательные прилагательные
.ьн҄	2/a; ! Притяжательные прилагательные
.ын҄	2/f+;
.ѣн		2/a; ! Относительные прилагательные
! Группа 11
!.р		2/a;
.ар҄	2/m;
!.ор	2/a;
.ер		2/a;
! Группа 12
.ьск	2/a; ! Относительные прилагательные
.ъств	2/n;
.ьств	2/n;
! Группа 14
.ат		2/a; ! Хабитативные прилагательные
.ит		2/a; ! Хабитативные прилагательные
!.от		2/f;
.ет		2/f;
! Группа 16
.ищ		2/m;
.ищ		2/n;
! Группа 17
@D.ORIENT.ELAT@.и		iDerivedVerb;
.а		DerivedVerb;
! Группа 18
.ов		2/a;
.ев		2/a;
.ов		N;
.ев		N;
.ен		1/m;
! 0		%0/n;
+Iotation	2/aNoDeriv;
entNeutra;
@R.CAR.ON@  2/a; ! Only after the caritive prefix без-

LEXICON A
! Группа 1
.об		2/f;
! Группа 2
.ав		2/f;
.ов		2/f;
! Группа 3
!.ог	2/m;
! Группа 4
.ьд		2/f;
! Группа 6
.ьj		2/n;
.ѣj		2/a++; ! Компаратив
! Группа 7
.ик		2/m;
.иц		2/f;
.ьц		2/m;
.ък		2/m;
! Группа 10
.ин		2/f;
.ьн		2/a;
.ын҄	2/f+;
! Группа 11
!.ор		2/a;
!.ер		2/a;
! Группа 12
.ост	1/f;
.ест	1/f;
.ъств	2/n;
.ьств	2/n;
! Группа 14
.от		2/f;
.ет		2/f;
! Группа 15
.ош		1/f;
.ош		2/f;
! Группа 17
@D.ORIENT.ELAT@.и		DerivedVerb;
.н		DerivedClass5;
.ов.а		DerivedVerb;
@D.ORIENT.ELAT@.ѣ+Class7	DerivedClass7;
! Группа 18
! 0		%0/n;
.ьi̯		2/a;

LEXICON V
! Группа 1
.ьб		2/f;
! Группа 2
!.в		2/f;
.ив		2/a;
.ив		2/n;
! Группа 3
.еж		2/m;
! Группа 4
!.д		2/f;
!.д		2/n;
! Группа 5
.ьзн	1/f;
! Группа 6
!.аj	2/f;
!.аj	2/m;
!.ьj	2/f+;
! Группа 7
.ък		2/m;
.ык		2/f;
.ык		2/m;
.ьц		2/f;
.ьц		2/m;
! Группа 8
!.л		2/m;
!.ѣл	2/a;
.ѣл		1/f;
! Группа 9
!.м		%0/n;
!.им	Part;
!.ом	Part;
.ем		Part;
! Группа 10
!.н		1/f;
!.н		2/m;
.ен		Part;
.ьн		2/a;
! Группа 11
!.р		2/a;
!.р		2/m;
! Группа 12
!.ст		3;
!.ств	2/n;
.ьств	2/n;
! Группа 13
!.т		1/f;
.т		tDeriv;
! Группа 14
.от		2/f;
!.ет		2/f;
.ът		2/m;
! Группа 15
!.х		2/f;
!.х		2/m;
.их		2/m;
! Группа 16
.ищ		2/n;
.ѫщ		Part;
! Группа 17
!.ѣ		DerivedClass7;
! 0		2/f;
! 0		2/m;

LEXICON tDeriv
!.л		2/n;
!.л		1/f;
.ыр҄	2/m;
.ер		2/f;
.ух		2/m;
!.в		2/a;
!.ел҄	2/m;

LEXICON iStem
CommonStem;

LEXICON Stem
.н		Part;
CommonStem;

LEXICON CommonStem
! Группа 2
!.в		V;
! Группа 5
.зн		1/f;
Infinitive;
enPart;
!.л		Part;
! Группа 8
.л.ьн	2/n;
.л		2/n;
Imperfective;

LEXICON enPart
.ен		Part;

LEXICON tPart
.т		DeverbalNoun;

LEXICON nPart
.н		DeverbalNoun;

LEXICON DeverbalNoun
.ьj		2/n;

LEXICON Infinitive
@D.POS.N@.т		Inf;

LEXICON iDerivedVerb
iStem;

LEXICON DerivedVerb
Stem;

LEXICON Inf
.и		#;
.в		2/f;
.ел҄	2/m+;
!1/f;

LEXICON Part
A;
.ьj		2/n;

LEXICON P
.ак		2/p;
.ѣк		2/p;
!A;

LEXICON Adv
.ш.ьн҄	2/a;
